Utah statutes.
58-60-405.   Qualifications for licensure.
(1)  All applicants for licensure as a professional counselor shall:
(a)  submit an application on a form provided by the division;
(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(c)  be of good moral character;
(d)  produce certified transcripts from an accredited institution of higher
education recognized by the division in collaboration with the board verifying
satisfactory completion of:
(i)  an education and degree in an education program in counseling with a core
curriculum defined by division rule under Section 58-1-203 preparing one to
competently engage in mental health therapy; and
(ii)  an earned doctoral or master's degree resulting from that education
program;
(e)  have completed a minimum of 4,000 hours of professional counselor
training as defined by division rule under Section 58-1-203, in not less than
two years, under the supervision of a professional counselor, psychiatrist,
psychologist, clinical social worker, registered psychiatric mental health
nurse specialist, or marriage and family therapist supervisor approved by the
division in collaboration with the board, and obtained after completion of the
education requirement in Subsection (1)(d);
(f)  document successful completion of not less than 1,000 hours of supervised
training in mental health therapy obtained after completion of the education
requirement in Subsection (1)(d), which training may be included as part of
the 4,000 hours of training in Subsection (1)(e), and of which documented
evidence demonstrates not less than 100 of the hours were obtained under the
direct personal face to face supervision of a mental health therapist approved
by the division in collaboration with the board; and
(g)  pass the examination requirement established by division rule under
Section 58-1-203.
(2) (a)  All applicants for certification as a professional counselor intern
shall comply with the provisions of Subsections (1)(a), (b), (c), and (d).
(b)  An individual's certification as a professional counselor intern is
limited to the period of time necessary to complete clinical training as
described in Subsections (1)(e) and (f) and extends not more than one year
from the date the minimum requirement for training is completed, unless the
individual presents satisfactory evidence to the division and the appropriate
board that the individual is making reasonable progress toward passing of the
qualifying examination for that profession or is otherwise on a course
reasonably expected to lead to licensure, but the period of time under this
Subsection (2)(b) may not exceed two years past the date the minimum
supervised clinical training requirement has been completed.
